ru: Тип крепления крышки фаркопа: Антивибрационный клин/расширитель; Требуется штифт фаркопа; Включает штифт фаркопа; Запирающийся штифт фаркопа; Магнитный; Прессовая посадка (посадка с натягом); Резьбовое/болтовое; Другое
de: Anbringungsart der Anhängerkupplungsabdeckung: Anti-Klapper-Keil/-Spanner; Anhängerkupplungsstift erforderlich; Inklusive Anhängerkupplungsstift; Abschließbarer Anhängerkupplungsstift; Magnetisch; Einpressmontage (Reibschluss); Geschraubt; Sonstiges
hu: Jármű vonószem fedél rögzítési típusa: Zörgésgátló ék / tágító; Vonóhorogcsap szükséges; Vonóhorogcsapot tartalmaz; Zárható vonóhorogcsap; Mágneses; Sajtolt (súrlódásos illesztés); Menetes / Csavaros; Egyéb
zh-TW: 拖車架用保護罩安裝類型: 防異音楔形物/膨脹器; 需要拖車鉤插銷; 包含拖車鉤插銷; 鎖定式拖車鉤插銷; 磁吸式; 壓入式 (摩擦配合); 螺紋/螺栓連接; 其他
fr: Type de fixation du cache-attelage: Cale/extenseur anti-vibration; Goupille d’attelage requise; Comprend une goupille d’attelage; Goupille d’attelage verrouillable; Magnétique; Ajustement par pression (ajustement par friction); Fileté/boulonné; Autre
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės vilkimo kablio dangtelio montavimo tipas: Barškėjimą slopinantis pleištas / plėtiklis; Reikalingas kablio kaištis; Su kablio kaiščiu; Fiksuojamas kablio kaištis; Magnetinis; Įspaudžiamas (frikcinis); Srieginis / prisukamas; Kita
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia krytu na ťažné zariadenia: Klin/rozpínadlo proti hluku; Vyžaduje sa čap ťažného zariadenia; Obsahuje čap ťažného zariadenia; Uzamykací čap ťažného zariadenia; Magnetické; Zalisované (na trenie); Na závit/skrutku; Iné
sv: Typ av montering för dragkrokskydd: Antiskaller-kil/expander; Låssprint krävs; Inkluderar låssprint; Låsbar sprint; Magnetisk; Presspassning (friktion); Gängad/bultad; Övrigt
ko: 차량용 히치 커버 장착 유형: 덜컹거림 방지 웨지/익스팬더; 히치 핀 필요; 히치 핀 포함; 잠금식 히치 핀; 자석식; 압입식(마찰 장착); 나사식/볼트식; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže poklopca kuke za vuču vozila: Klin/ekspander protiv zveckanja; Potreban je klin kuke; Uključuje klin kuke; Sigurnosni klin kuke; Magnetsko; Utično (drži na trenje); Pomoću vijka; Ostalo
zh-CN: 交通工具牵引钩盖安装类型: 防震楔块/膨胀器; 需要挂车销; 含挂车销; 锁定挂车销; 磁吸; 压接 (摩擦配合); 螺纹/螺栓连接; 其他
ja: 車両ヒッチカバーマウントタイプ: ガタつき防止ウェッジ/エキスパンダー; ヒッチピン必要; ヒッチピン付属; ロック式ヒッチピン; マグネット式; 圧入 (摩擦ばめ); ねじ込み/ボルト留め; その他
tr: Araç çeki demiri kapağı montaj tipi: Tıkırtı önleyici takoz/genişletici; Römork pimi gerekir; Römork pimi dahil; Kilitli römork pimi; Manyetik; Geçmeli (sürtünmeli geçme); Dişli/cıvatalı; Diğer
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης καλύμματος κοτσαδόρου οχήματος: Σφήνα/διαστολέας κατά των κραδασμών; Απαιτείται πείρος κοτσαδόρου; Περιλαμβάνει πείρο κοτσαδόρου; Πείρος κοτσαδόρου με κλειδαριά; Μαγνητικό; Πρεσαριστό (εφαρμογή με τριβή); Με σπείρωμα/βιδωτό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem da tampa do engate do veículo: Cunha/expansor antirruído; Requer pino de engate; Inclui pino de engate; Pino de engate com trava; Magnético; Encaixe por pressão (encaixe por fricção); Rosqueado/parafusado; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de montare a capacului pentru cârligul de remorcare auto: Pană/expandor anti-vibrație; Necesită știft pentru cârlig; Include știft pentru cârlig; Știft de blocare pentru cârlig; Magnetic; Fixare prin presare (fixare prin frecare); Filetat / fixat cu șuruburi; Altele
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt nắp bọc móc kéo của xe: Nêm/bộ mở rộng chống kêu; Cần chốt móc kéo; Bao gồm chốt móc kéo; Chốt móc kéo có khóa; Nam châm; Lắp ép (vừa khít); Bắt ren/bu-lông; Khác
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на капак за теглич: Уплътнителен клин/разширител против вибрации; Изисква щифт за теглич; Включва щифт за теглич; Заключващ щифт за теглич; Магнитен; Чрез натиск (фрикционно закрепване); На резба/болт; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže pokrova vlečne kljuke vozila: Klin/razširjevalnik proti ropotanju; Potreben zatič za vlečno kljuko; Vključuje zatič za vlečno kljuko; Zatič za vlečno kljuko s ključavnico; Magnetno; Prileganje na pritisk (trenje); Navojno/vijačeno; Drugo
en: Vehicle hitch cover mounting type: Anti-rattle wedge/expander; Hitch pin required; Includes hitch pin; Locking hitch pin; Magnetic; Press-fit (friction fit); Threaded/bolted; Other
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งฝาครอบหัวบอลลากจูง: ลิ่ม/ตัวขยายกันกระแทก; ต้องใช้สลักลากจูง; รวมสลักลากจูง; สลักลากจูงแบบล็อกได้; แม่เหล็ก; สวมอัด (สวมแน่น); แบบเกลียว/ขันนอต; อื่นๆ
nl: Bevestigingstype trekhaakafdekking: Antirammelwig/-expander; Trekhaakpen vereist; Inclusief trekhaakpen; Vergrendelbare trekhaakpen; Magnetisch; Perspassing (wrijvingspassing); Schroefdraad/geschroefd; Overig
it: Tipo di montaggio della copertura per il gancio traino del veicolo: Cuneo/espansore antivibrazione; Perno di traino richiesto; Perno di traino incluso; Perno di traino con serratura; Magnetico; Montaggio a pressione (fissaggio a frizione); Filettato/imbullonato; Altro
fi: Ajoneuvon vetokoukun asennustyyppi: Tärinää estävä kiila/laajennin; Vaatii vetokoukun tapin; Sisältää vetokoukun tapin; Lukittava vetokoukun tappi; Magneettinen; Puristussovite (kitkasovite); Kierteitetty/pultattu; Muu
cs: Typ uchycení krytu tažného zařízení vozidla: Antivibrační klín / rozpěra; Vyžaduje čep tažného zařízení; Včetně čepu tažného zařízení; Zamykací čep tažného zařízení; Magnetický; Zalisování (třecí spoj); Závitový/šroubový; Jiné
da: Monteringstype for cover til anhængertræk: Anti-rasle-kile/ekspander; Kræver låsesplit; Inkluderer låsesplit; Låsesplit med lås; Magnetisk; Press-fit (friktionspasning); Med gevind/boltet; Andet
pl: Typ mocowania osłony haka pojazdu: Klin/rozpieracz antywibracyjny; Wymagany sworzeń haka; Zawiera sworzeń haka; Sworzeń haka z zamkiem; Magnetyczne; Wciskane; Gwintowane/przykręcane; Inne
nb: Monteringstype for deksel til tilhengerfeste: Antivibrasjonskile/-ekspander; Hengerfestepinne kreves; Inkluderer hengerfestepinne; Låsbar hengerfestepinne; Magnetisk; Presspasning (friksjonspasning); Gjenget/boltet; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da cobertura do engate do veículo: Cunha/expansor antirruído; Requer pino de engate; Inclui pino de engate; Pino de engate com bloqueio; Magnético; Ajuste por pressão (ajuste por fricção); Roscado/aparafusado; Outro
es: Tipo de montaje de la cubierta del enganche del vehículo: Cuña/expansor antitraqueteo; Requiere pasador de enganche; Incluye pasador de enganche; Pasador de enganche con bloqueo; Magnético; Ajuste a presión (ajuste por fricción); Roscado/atornillado; Otro